Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 20
HOURS OF SERVICE

42-4-2001. Maximum hours of service - ready-mix concrete truck operators.

Any person who operates a commercial motor vehicle solely in intrastate commerce for the purpose of transporting wet, ready-mix concrete need not comply with 49 CFR 395.3 (b). No such person shall drive for any period after:

Having been on duty seventy hours in any seven consecutive days if the employing motor carrier does not operate every day in the week; or

Having been on duty eighty hours in any period of eight consecutive days if the employing motor carrier operates motor vehicles every day of the week.

Within a seven-day workweek all hours of service after sixty hours are voluntary starting the next scheduled workday.

Twenty-four consecutive hours off duty shall constitute the end of any seven or eight consecutive-day period.

Any commercial motor vehicle that transports hazardous materials shall be exempt from this section and shall be subject to the federal hours-of-service limitations in 49 CFR 395 and 350.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 311, § 1, effective April 8; entire section amended, p. 1034, § 72, effective August 6.